Maryland, session 2026, HB1623.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 16 – Montgomery County
65–1.
(A) For the purposes of this chapter, the Village of Drummond, Montgomery
County, Maryland[, as hereinafter described,] (THE “VILLAGE”) shall constitute a special
tax area or district and shall [be deemed and taken to] comprise certain parcels of land,
namely: The subdivision in [said] Montgomery County called “Drummond” as per plat no.
48, recorded in Plat Book No. 1, one (1) of the land records for [said] Montgomery County,
and the adjoining subdivision called “First Addition to Drummond” as per plat no. 89,
recorded in [said] Plat Book No. 1.
– 1 –

Ch. 149 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL OF DRUMMOND, MONTGOMERY COUNTY,
MARYLAND (THE “VILLAGE COUNCIL”) SHALL CONSTITUTE THE GOVERNING BODY
OF THE VILLAGE.
65–2.
(a) On and after April 25, 1947, the following described area shall no longer be
included within the special taxing area of the Village [of Drummond, Montgomery County,
Maryland]: Lots numbered One, Two, and Three in the Village [of Drummond], located at
the southwest corner of Wisconsin and Hunt Avenues.
(b) The owner or owners of the property in [said] THE area [shall] DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY not [hereafter] be levied upon for taxes
applicable only to the special taxing area of the [said] Village [of Drummond], nor shall
any indebtedness of [said] THE special taxing area, incurred after April 25, 1947, be a lien
upon the area so removed from [said] THE special taxing area[; provided, that any].
(C) ANY future levy for any bond or indebtedness of [said] THE special taxing
area, incurred before April 25, 1947, or any extension, refinancing or renewal thereof, shall
include the owners of and be a lien upon the property within [said] THE excluded area[;
provided, however, that] BUT nothing [herein contained] IN THIS SECTION shall be
construed to relieve either the owner or the property in [said] THE area DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION from the obligation of the tax levy of July 1, 1946.
65–3.
(A) The [county council for] Montgomery County COUNCIL (THE “COUNTY
COUNCIL”) is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to levy and cause to be collected
from the property owners at the time of the county tax levy for [the] EACH FISCAL year
[commencing July 1, 1916, and ending June 30, 1917, and each succeeding year,] within
the [said village known as Drummond, as named and created by this chapter,] VILLAGE
fourteen cents ($0.14) on each one hundred dollars ($100.00) of the assessable value of the
real property other than operating real property of a public utility and thirty–five cents
($0.35) on each one hundred dollars ($100.00) of the assessable value of the personal
property and operating real property of a public utility in [said village] THE VILLAGE, to
be collected as all other county taxes in [said] THE county are collected[; to be] AND paid
over by [said county council] THE COUNTY COUNCIL to the [treasurer of the committee
herein authorized to be created, or his successors selected by the majority of the members
as said committee, upon said treasurer having been duly selected by a majority of said
committee, and giving corporate bond to Montgomery County, Maryland, satisfactory to
and approved by the county manager and the county attorney in a penal sum to be fixed by
them, conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of said treasurer; the said county
council] VILLAGE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 149
(B) THE COUNTY COUNCIL shall [also] order and have paid over to [said
treasurer] THE VILLAGE the proportion of the county road tax to be levied and collected
in the same manner as though [said] THE Village [of Drummond] was an incorporated
town, and the [said village] VILLAGE shall for that purpose[,] be considered by [said
county council] THE COUNTY COUNCIL as an incorporated town in [said] THE county[;].
(C) THE VILLAGE SHALL USE all of [said] THE funds [to be used directly by or
through said committee,] UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION exclusively for
opening, improving, widening, maintaining, repairing and lighting the streets, roads, lanes,
approaches, alleys, sidewalks, parking, drainage, sewerage, sanitation and other village
improvements, FOR HIRING EMPLOYEES, and for furnishing police and fire protection,
clerical, PROFESSIONAL, and other public service, including the removal AND DISPOSAL
of SNOW, LEAVES, ashes, garbage and other refuse[, and the disposal thereof], and for the
enforcement of the requirements of all conveyances for properties situated in [said village]
THE VILLAGE, [and] for enforcing such building, sanitary and other regulations as [said
committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL subject to the approval of the [county council]
COUNTY COUNCIL may prescribe for [said village] THE VILLAGE, or for any part thereof,
AND FOR OTHER PURPOSES DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE VILLAGE COUNCIL FOR
THE OPERATION OF THE VILLAGE AND THE PROTECTION AND PRESERVATION OF
THE PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE.
(D) (1) THE VILLAGE SHALL OPERATE ON AN ANNUAL BUDGET FOR A
FISCAL YEAR BEGINNING EACH JULY 1 AND ENDING AT THE END OF EACH JUNE 30
OF THE FOLLOWING YEAR.
(2) BEFORE ADOPTING AN ANNUAL BUDGET, THE VILLAGE COUNCIL
SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC HEARING.
(3) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL PROVIDE THE PUBLIC NOTICE OF
AN ANNUAL BUDGET HEARING AT LEAST 10 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING, INCLUDING
BY PROVIDING A COPY OF THE PROPOSED ANNUAL BUDGET OR A SUMMARY OF THE
PROPOSED ANNUAL BUDGET.
(4) THE ANNUAL BUDGET SHALL CONSIST OF A FINANCIAL PLAN FOR
THE FISCAL YEAR AND SHALL CONTAIN ESTIMATES OF ANTICIPATED REVENUES AND
PROPOSED EXPENDITURES.
(5) PUBLIC FUNDS MAY NOT BE EXPENDED WITHOUT FIRST HAVING
BEEN APPROPRIATED BY THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(6) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY AMEND THE BUDGET AND
APPROPRIATE FUNDS FROM A RESERVE PROVIDED IN THE BUDGET FROM TIME TO
– 3 –

Ch. 149 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
TIME DURING THE FISCAL YEAR TO MEET EXTRAORDINARY OR UNANTICIPATED
EXPENDITURES THAT MAY ARISE.
(7) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL HIRE OR EMPLOY A CERTIFIED
PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT TO AUDIT THE VILLAGE’S FINANCES.
65–4.
(A) If in any year the majority of the [said Drummond Citizens’ Committee]
VILLAGE COUNCIL shall decide the sum hereinbefore authorized to be taxed and levied
is in excess of the amount required for the ensuing year, then [and in that event,] the [said
committee] VILLAGE COUNCIL may, on or before April 15 of any year, notify in writing
the [county council of Montgomery County] COUNTY COUNCIL to make a reduction in the
[said] levy of fourteen cents ($0.14) on each one hundred dollars ($100.00) of assessable
value of real property other than operating real property of a public utility and thirty–five
cents ($0.35) on each one hundred dollars ($100.00) of assessable value of personal property
and operating real property of a public utility, [as hereinbefore provided for,] WITH the
amount of [said] THE reduction to be determined by the [said committee] VILLAGE
COUNCIL and specified in the [said] notification to the [county council; and upon]
COUNTY COUNCIL.
(B) ON receipt of [such] A notification UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, the [board of county council of Montgomery County] COUNTY COUNCIL is
authorized, empowered and directed to make a levy less than the [said] fourteen cents
($0.14) or thirty–five cents ($0.35) in the amount determined and specified by the [said
committee] VILLAGE COUNCIL.
65–5.
(A) On the first Monday [in] OF EACH May [in the year 1917 and on the same
day in each year thereafter], an election shall be held in the [said] Village [of Drummond]
for the election of three (3) [committeemen] MEMBERS OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, each
of whom shall have been a resident of [said] THE Village [of Drummond] for AT LEAST six
(6) months [previous to said] BEFORE THE election, [and over the age of twenty–one (21)
years, the three (3) said committeemen to be and] AND BE AT LEAST 21 YEARS OLD.
(B) THE INDIVIDUALS ELECTED SHALL constitute the [Drummond Citizens’
Committee] VILLAGE COUNCIL for the ensuing year, each of whom shall qualify within
twenty (20) days after [said] THE election by taking the oath prescribed by the Constitution
of [Maryland] THE STATE, before an officer of the law duly commissioned to administer
[same] THE OATH.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 149
(C) (1) The annual election of [said committeemen as herein provided] THE
MEMBERS OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL shall be held [under and] in accordance with the
laws of the State [of Maryland], but the returns [thereof] OF THE ELECTION shall be made
to the [county council of Montgomery County; all] COUNTY COUNCIL.
(2) ALL residents of [said] THE Village [of Drummond for six (6) months
previous to said election, and over the age of twenty–one (21) years,] WHO ARE AT LEAST
18 YEARS OLD shall be eligible to vote at [such elections; said elections] THE ELECTION.
(3) THE ELECTION shall be conducted by UP TO three (3) judges of election
[and two (2) clerks, to be] appointed by [said committee, who shall serve without pay; and
the polls of said election shall be open from 7:00 p.m. to 9:00 p.m. on the first Monday in
May as hereinbefore provided] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(D) (1) THE MEMBERS OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL SERVE
WITHOUT PAY.
(2) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL
CONSTITUTE A QUORUM FOR THE TRANSACTION OF BUSINESS.
(3) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL DETERMINE THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL’S RULES AND ORDER OF BUSINESS.
(4) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT LEAST 11 TIMES EACH
YEAR ON DATES DETERMINED BY THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, EXCEPT THAT THE MAYOR
AND THE VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY CALL SPECIAL MEETINGS OF THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL.
(5) ALL MEETINGS OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, REGULAR AND
SPECIAL, SHALL BE PUBLIC MEETINGS DURING WHICH MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC
SHALL HAVE A REASONABLE OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD, EXCEPT THAT THE
VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY HOLD CLOSED SESSIONS, WORK SESSIONS AT WHICH PUBLIC
COMMENT MAY BE PROHIBITED, AND SPECIAL PURPOSE MEETINGS AT WHICH ALL
PUBLIC COMMENT MAY BE LIMITED TO THE SUBJECT OF THE MEETING.
(6) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL KEEP A RECORD OF MEETING
MINUTES AND MAKE THE RECORD AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION.
(E) ANY MEMBER OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY BE REMOVED BY THE
COUNTY COUNCIL UPON THE CHARGE OF MALFEASANCE OR MISFEASANCE IN
OFFICE, PROFFERED BY A MEMBER OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, AFTER DUE NOTICE
OF THE CHARGE AND OPPORTUNITY TO DEFEND AGAINST THE CHARGE AT A
HEARING.
– 5 –

Ch. 149 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
65–6.
(a) (1) [Said Drummond Citizens’ Committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL is
empowered to ESTABLISH, OPERATE, MAINTAIN, AND CONTROL ALL PUBLIC WAYS IN
THE VILLAGE EXCEPT THE PUBLIC WAYS UNDER THE JURISDICTION OF THE STATE,
INCLUDING BY REQUIRING THE OWNERS OF PROPERTY ABUTTING A STREET, ROAD,
OR LANE TO REMOVE ICE, SNOW, DIRT, DEBRIS, OR OTHER OBSTRUCTIONS AS WELL
AS ANY OTHER ACTION NECESSARY FOR THE PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY,
CONSTRUCT A NEW STREET, ROAD, OR LANE, grade, pave, macadamize or otherwise
improve any existing street, road or lane, or any street, road or lane which has been or may
be acquired and opened for public use, and to lay sidewalks [and], curbs, AND GUTTERS
thereon[; provided, that said Drummond Citizens’ Committee].
(2) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, subject to the approval of the [county
council] COUNTY COUNCIL and after petition of residents and hearing, as hereinafter
provided, shall have power to assess the cost, or any part of the cost, of [said] THE
CONSTRUCTING, grading, paving, macadamizing or improving against the property
abutting on [said] A street, road or lane, or sidewalk, in proportion to the frontage of [said]
THE abutting property on the [same; provided, further, that upon] STREET, ROAD OR
LANE, OR SIDEWALK.
(3) ON the petition in writing of two–thirds of the residents owning
property abutting upon any street, road or lane to be CONSTRUCTED, graded, paved,
macadamized or otherwise to be improved under the provisions of this section requesting
the CONSTRUCTING, grading, paving, macadamizing or otherwise improving of [such]
THE streets, roads or lanes, it shall be the duty of the [Drummond Citizens’ Committee]
VILLAGE COUNCIL to make the [said] assessment against the abutting property to
provide the funds for and cause to be performed the necessary work or construction to be
done in accordance with the provisions herein provided[; and provided, further, that
before].
(4) BEFORE any contract for work shall be entered into, or any obligation
with respect [thereto] TO THE CONTRACT incurred, notice shall be given to the owners
and others of record interested in [said] THE abutting property of a hearing at which they
will be given an opportunity to be heard[, such].
(5) THE hearing [to be had] SHALL BE before [said Drummond Citizens’
Committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL, which shall decide the matters properly brought
before it[; and any].
(6) ANY party affected by the final decision of [said Drummond Citizens’
Committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL made after [such] THE hearing shall have the right
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 149
to appeal [therefrom] THE DECISION within ten (10) days to the [circuit court of]
Montgomery County CIRCUIT COURT.
(b) (1) Any tax so assessed, as above provided in this section, shall be payable
to [the county treasurer] MONTGOMERY COUNTY in from four (4) to ten (10) semiannual
installments, as nearly equal as may be, the first installment thereof to become due and
payable within six (6) months after the levy of [said] THE special tax as above provided,
and each of the other [said] installments within six (6) months after the preceding one (1)
shall have become due[; each].
(2) EACH installment of [said] THE tax shall become a lien against [said]
THE abutting property and shall bear interest from the date of levy thereof at the rate of
six (6) per centum per annum until paid[;] or [said] THE tax may be paid in full without
interest during the first installment period[, and if].
(3) IF any of [said] THE installments [thereof be] OF THE TAX ARE not
paid within thirty (30) days after [same] THE INSTALLMENT shall have become due, the
entire amount of [said] THE tax assessed to the person [or persons] or corporation in
default, with interest, shall [thereupon] THEN become due and payable, and may be
collected in the same manner provided in the act for the collection of unpaid taxes. [And
the said Drummond Citizens’ Committee]
(4) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL shall have the power to prescribe the number
of semiannual installments in which the tax [so assessed, as above provided,] shall be
payable.
(c) All money so received by [said county treasurer] THE COUNTY shall, [upon]
ON order of [said county council] THE COUNTY COUNCIL, be paid over to the treasurer of
[said] THE Village [of Drummond, and the said Drummond Citizens’ Committee shall
become charged with the duty of paving, grading, macadamizing or otherwise improving
said streets, roads, lanes or sidewalks within said village].
(d) (1) For the purpose of making the improvements provided for in this
section, the [said Drummond Citizens’ Committee] VILLAGE COUNCIL is [hereby]
authorized and empowered to borrow money and otherwise contract indebtedness and
obligate [said] THE Village [of Drummond] in an amount not exceeding at any time the
sum of four (4) per centum of the assessed valuation of the real property other than
operating real property of a public utility and ten (10) per centum of the assessed valuation
of the operating real property of a public utility within [said village] THE VILLAGE, and
for this purpose [said] THE Village [of Drummond] shall be and hereby is constituted a
corporation[, and the said Drummond Citizens’ Committee].
(2) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL is empowered to act for [said] THE
corporation[; provided, that should].
– 7 –

Ch. 149 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) IF there [be] IS A default on bonds or other indebtedness incurred by
the [said citizens’ committee of the said Village of Drummond for the said village] VILLAGE
COUNCIL, it shall be the duty of the [county council of Montgomery County] COUNTY
COUNCIL to levy or have levied special general taxes against the real property of [said]
THE Village [of Drummond] to the extent only that [such] THE default bonds or incurred
indebtedness shall be liquidated.
65–7.
[Any member of the Drummond Citizens’ Committee may be removed by the county
council upon the charge of malfeasance or misfeasance in office, preferred by a member of
said committee, after due notice of said charge and opportunity has been given in defense
thereof, and a hearing to be fixed therefor.]
(A) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL SHALL APPOINT:
(1) A MAYOR, WHO SHALL PRESIDE OVER MEETINGS OF THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL AND SERVE AS THE CHIEF EXECUTIVE OF THE VILLAGE;
(2) A TREASURER, WHO SHALL ASSIST IN THE PREPARATION OF THE
ANNUAL BUDGET AND SUPERVISE THE DISBURSEMENT OF PUBLIC FUNDS;
(3) A SECRETARY, WHO SHALL ASSIST IN THE KEEPING OF RECORDS
OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL; AND
(4) OTHER OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES, WHO SHALL HOLD TERMS AND
WHO SHALL HAVE DUTIES ESTABLISHED BY THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(B) The [said treasurer and other] officers AND EMPLOYEES of [said] THE
Village [of Drummond] shall hold their offices or positions at the pleasure of [said
Drummond Citizens’ Committee or in conformity with contracts which may be made by and
between said committee and such officers and employees, for a period not to extend beyond
the limits of the terms of office of said committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(C) (1) THE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES OF THE VILLAGE SHALL GIVE
BOND TO THE VILLAGE IN AN AMOUNT AND WITH SURETY DETERMINED BY THE
VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(2) THE PREMIUMS OF FIDELITY BONDS OWED BY OFFICERS AND
EMPLOYEES OF THE VILLAGE SHALL BE PAID BY THE VILLAGE.
65–8.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 149
(A) [Said Drummond Citizens’ Committee shall] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY
not expend for material or work [in connection with anyone undertaking] a sum exceeding
[three hundred dollars ($300.00)] FIFTEEN THOUSAND DOLLARS ($15,000), OR THE
AMOUNT FOR WHICH PUBLICATION OF NOTICE OF PROCUREMENT IS REQUIRED BY
STATE LAW, WHICHEVER IS GREATER, without having first advertised the specifications
[therefor] and inviting bids [for the same], after which [said committee] THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL may purchase [such] THE material or make contract for [such] THE work, or
have [such] THE work done by employing labor, or otherwise, as it may deem best.
(B) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION TO THE CONTRARY, THE
VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY CONTRACT FOR MATERIAL OR WORK WITHOUT FIRST
HAVING INVITED BIDS IF:
(1) THE CONTRACT AWARD SERVES A PUBLIC PURPOSE AND THERE IS
ONLY ONE SOURCE FOR THE REQUIRED MATERIAL TO MEET THE NEEDS OF THE
VILLAGE;
(2) THE CONTRACT IS IN CONNECTION WITH POTENTIAL OR PENDING
LITIGATION, CONDEMNATION, OR COLLECTIVE BARGAINING;
(3) A PROPOSED CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR HAS BEEN
SPECIFICALLY IDENTIFIED IN A GRANT ACCEPTED BY THE VILLAGE;
(4) A PROPOSED CONTRACTOR OR SUBCONTRACTOR HAS BEEN
SELECTED THROUGH A COMPETITIVE BIDDING PROCESS UNDERTAKEN BY A STATE,
COUNTY, OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR COOPERATIVELY WITH THE VILLAGE,
AND SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TERMS ARE OFFERED TO THE VILLAGE;
(5) THE SERVICES ARE PROFESSIONAL IN NATURE, INCLUDING
ACCOUNTING, ARCHITECTURE, AUDITING, ENGINEERING, LEGAL, OR SURVEYING
SERVICES; OR
(6) THERE EXISTS A THREAT TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE OR WHERE DELAY WOULD SERIOUSLY INJURE THE VILLAGE FINANCIALLY
OR OTHERWISE.
65–9.
The [said county council] COUNTY COUNCIL may, [upon] ON recommendation of
the [Drummond Citizens’ Committee] VILLAGE COUNCIL, adopt [such] regulations with
respect to dumping of garbage, sanitation, erection of buildings, care of property, USE OF
PUBLIC WAYS, PARKING ON PUBLIC WAYS, or other police or health regulations, and
– 9 –

Ch. 149 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
provide penalties for the violation [thereof] OF THE REGULATIONS as [said board] THE
COUNTY COUNCIL may deem proper, which regulations may be enforced by or through
[said committee] THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
65–10.
[Said] THE members of [said Drummond Citizens’ Committee] THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL, for the purpose of making contracts or otherwise incurring liabilities in the
performance of the duties provided by this subtitle shall be considered in law as a
corporation, and are not to be held individually or personally liable in connection
[therewith] THOSE DUTIES.
65–11.
(A) The treasurer of [said Drummond Citizens’ Committee] THE VILLAGE
COUNCIL shall deposit all funds [coming into his hands, as such,] in A depositary [or
depositaries] as may be designated by the majority vote of the [said committee] VILLAGE
COUNCIL, duly recorded in the minutes [thereof, to his credit, as such treasurer, and that
said treasurer shall not dispose of any of the funds coming into his hands, as such treasurer,
except upon check, duly signed by him, as such treasurer, and countersigned by the
chairman of said committee, or some member thereof acting as chairman; said acting
chairman shall be duly authorized to act by resolution of said committee which must be
first placed upon the minutes of the committee] OF THE VILLAGE COUNCIL.
(B) ALL CHECKS ISSUED FROM THE VILLAGE SHALL BE SIGNED BY THE
TREASURER.
(C) THE VILLAGE COUNCIL MAY AUTHORIZE PAYMENTS TO BE MADE BY
METHODS OTHER THAN CHECK IF REASONABLE SAFETY MEASURES ARE
INSTITUTED.
65–12.
(A) THE ENUMERATION OF PARTICULAR POWERS IN THIS CHAPTER MAY
NOT BE HELD OR DEEMED TO BE EXCLUSIVE.
(B) THE VILLAGE SHALL HAVE OTHER POWERS AS ARE INCIDENT TO THE
POWERS SPECIFICALLY ENUMERATED, AS ARE A NECESSARY CONSEQUENCE OF THE
POWERS SPECIFICALLY ENUMERATED, OR AS ARE A NECESSARY CONSEQUENCE OF
THE POWERS HEREIN CONFERRED.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 149
(C) IN ADDITION TO THE POWERS ENUMERATED IN THIS CHAPTER, THE
VILLAGE SHALL HAVE ALL POWERS, RIGHTS, AND PRIVILEGES NOW OR HEREAFTER
GRANTED BY THE CONSTITUTION AND LAWS OF THE STATE.
65–13.
IF ANY SECTION OR PART OF A SECTION OF THIS CHAPTER IS HELD INVALID
BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, THE HOLDING MAY NOT AFFECT THE
REMAINDER OF THIS CHAPTER NOR THE CONTEXT IN WHICH THE SECTION OR PART
OF THE SECTION HELD INVALID APPEARS, EXCEPT TO THE EXTENT THAT AN ENTIRE
SECTION OR PART OF A SECTION MAY BE INSEPARABLY CONNECTED IN MEANING
AND EFFECT WITH THE SECTION OR PART OF THE SECTION TO WHICH THE HOLDING
DIRECTLY APPLIES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 11 –